Massachusetts, session 194th, H2254.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 40 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 8H the
following section:-
Section 8H½. A city or town that accepts this section, in the manner provided in section 4
of chapter 4, may by ordinance or by-law impose a fine on the disposal, in residential or
commercial curbside solid waste or recycling bins, of beverage containers that are redeemable
under section 323 of chapter 94. Such ordinance or by-law shall provide for periodic inspections
of curbside bins, in a manner determined by the municipality, and shall affix a penalty for each
violation, not exceeding $100.
of 1